Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-216
Fugitive to this state; sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 55-214 and 55-215 shall be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be lawful. Nothing contained in said sections shall be deemed to repeal, modify or conflict with any of the provisions of present or future laws of this state with relation to the fresh pursuit of criminals.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 6, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-406;

R.S.1943, § 55-216.